Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 7 Implied Trusts

53-12-130.
Resulting trusts.

A resulting trust is a trust implied for the benefit of the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest when it is determined that the settlor did not intend that the holder of the legal title to the trust property also should have the beneficial interest in the property under any of the following circumstances:

A trust is created but fails, in whole or in part, for any reason;

A trust is fully performed without exhausting all the trust property; or

A purchase money resulting trust as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-131 is established.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-130

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-131.
Purchase money resulting trusts.

A purchase money resulting trust is a resulting trust implied for the benefit of the person paying consideration for the transfer to another person of legal title to real or personal property.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the payment of consideration as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall create a presumption in favor of a resulting trust, but such presumption shall be rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence.

If the payor of consideration and transferee of the property as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section are husband and wife, parent and child, or siblings, a gift shall be presumed, but such presumption shall be rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-131

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For comment on Ashbaugh v. Ashbaugh,

222 Ga. 811

,

152 S.E.2d 888

(1966), see
18 Mercer L. Rev. 513 (1967).

For note, “The Significance of Stokes v. Stokes: An Examination of Property Rights Upon Divorce in Georgia,” see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 695 (1982).

For comment, “The Georgia Supreme Court’s Creation of an Equitable Interest in Marital Property — Yours? Mine? Ours!,” see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For article, “Are We Witnessing the Erosion of Georgia’s Separate Property Distinction?,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 14 (2007).

53-12-132.
Constructive trusts.

A constructive trust is a trust implied whenever the circumstances are such that the person holding legal title to property, either from fraud or otherwise, cannot enjoy the beneficial interest in the property without violating some established principle of equity.

The person claiming the beneficial interest in the property may be found to have waived the right to a constructive trust by subsequent ratification or long acquiescence.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-132

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For note, “Vesting Title in a Murderer:
Where is the Equity in the Georgia Supreme Court’s Interpretation of the Slayer Statute in Levenson?,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 877 (2011).

53-12-133.
Parol evidence and implied trusts.

In all cases in which a trust is sought to be implied, the court may hear parol evidence of the nature of the transaction, the circumstances, and the conduct of the parties, either to imply or rebut the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-133

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For comment, “The Georgia Supreme Court’s Creation of an Equitable Interest in Marital Property — Yours? Mine? Ours!,” see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 449 (1982).